District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0624.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Elizabeth M. Goodman Health School Redesignation Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 401 and 422(b) through (e) of the Street and Alley Closing and
Acquisition Procedures Act of 1982, effective March 10, 1983 (D.C. Law 4-201; D.C. Official
Code § 9-202.01 and 9-204.22(b) through (e)) (“Act”), and notwithstanding section 422(a) of the
Act (D.C. Official Code § 9-204.22(a)), the Council designates the school in Lot 0005 in Square
2820, located at 4300 13th Street, N.W., as “Elizabeth M. Goodman Health School”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).